Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1759
Remedies; not exclusive.

The provisions of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act are not exclusive. The remedies provided for violation of any provision of the act or for conduct prescribed by any provision of the act shall be in addition to any other procedures or remedies for any violation or conduct provided for in any other law.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 59;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 28.